Hawaii statutes.
§608-2 District court, salaries, expenses,
etc. The salaries of the district judges, clerks, and other assistants and
the expenses of the district judges shall be paid by the State. The judges
shall have power to appoint such additional officers or employees as may be
required by the courts and for which appropriations have been made by the
legislature. Except as otherwise provided, such officers and employees shall
be subject to chapter 76 and the appropriate collective bargaining agreement,
executive order, executive directive, or rule. [L 1909, c 122, §1; RL 1925,
§2133; RL 1935, pt of §3941; RL 1945, §9777; RL 1955, §220-2; am L 1965, c 97,
§16; HRS §608-2; am L 1970, c 188, §30; am L 1972, c 88, §7(c); am L 2002, c
148, §44]

Cross References

Salary of district judge, see §604-2.5.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next